District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19c

Department of Motor Vehicles transfer of Registry information requirements.

(a)

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall transfer to the designated organ procurement organization the name, gender, date of birth, and most recent address of any person who obtains a driver’s license or identification card and who has made or revoked an anatomical gift.

(b)

(1)

The initial transfer of donor information shall be transferred to the organ procurement organization by the Department of Motor Vehicles within 30 days of receipt of a written request from the organ procurement organization.

(2)

All subsequent transfers of donor information, new and revisions to previously submitted information, shall be submitted monthly, or as otherwise determined by the Mayor, at no charge to the organ procurement organization.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20c, 55 DCR 2532
This section is referenced in § 7-1531.19b.